Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7430
Blood component, defined.

Blood component means that part of blood separated by physical or mechanical means.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7404;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 4.